src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1653 Y 28
SFX 1653 eti eti
SFX 1653 eti im
SFX 1653 eti iš
SFX 1653 eti i
SFX 1653 eti imo
SFX 1653 eti ite
SFX 1653 eti e
SFX 1653 eti eo
SFX 1653 eti ela
SFX 1653 eti elo
SFX 1653 eti eli
SFX 1653 eti ele
SFX 1653 eti eću
SFX 1653 eti ećeš
SFX 1653 eti eće
SFX 1653 eti ećemo
SFX 1653 eti ećete
SFX 1653 eti eće
SFX 1653 eti i
SFX 1653 eti imo
SFX 1653 eti ite
SFX 1653 eti eh
SFX 1653 eti e
SFX 1653 eti eše
SFX 1653 eti esmo
SFX 1653 eti este
SFX 1653 eti ehu
SFX 1653 eti evši

SFX 1654 Y 28
SFX 1654 ći ti
SFX 1654 ći gnem
SFX 1654 ći gneš
SFX 1654 ći gne
SFX 1654 ći gnemo
SFX 1654 ći gnete
SFX 1654 ći gnu
SFX 1654 ći gao
SFX 1654 ći gla
SFX 1654 ći glo
SFX 1654 ći gli
SFX 1654 ći gle
SFX 1654 ći gnuću
SFX 1654 ći gnućeš
SFX 1654 ći gnuće
SFX 1654 ći gnućemo
SFX 1654 ći gnućete
SFX 1654 ći gnuće
SFX 1654 ći gni
SFX 1654 ći gnimo
SFX 1654 ći gnite
SFX 1654 ći goh
SFX 1654 ći že
SFX 1654 ći goše
SFX 1654 ći gosmo
SFX 1654 ći goste
SFX 1654 ći žahu
SFX 1654 ći gavši

SFX 1655 Y 34
SFX 1655 biti biti
SFX 1655 biti bijem
SFX 1655 biti biješ
SFX 1655 biti bije
SFX 1655 biti bijemo
SFX 1655 biti bijete
SFX 1655 biti udem
SFX 1655 biti udeš
SFX 1655 biti ude
SFX 1655 biti udemo
SFX 1655 biti udete
SFX 1655 biti udu
SFX 1655 biti biju
SFX 1655 biti bio
SFX 1655 biti bila
SFX 1655 biti bilo
SFX 1655 biti bili
SFX 1655 biti bile
SFX 1655 biti biću
SFX 1655 biti bićeš
SFX 1655 biti biće
SFX 1655 biti bićemo
SFX 1655 biti bićete
SFX 1655 biti biće
SFX 1655 biti bij
SFX 1655 biti bijmo
SFX 1655 biti bijte
SFX 1655 biti bih
SFX 1655 biti bi
SFX 1655 biti biše
SFX 1655 biti bismo
SFX 1655 biti biste
SFX 1655 biti bahu
SFX 1655 biti bivši

SFX 1656 Y 27
SFX 1656 vati vati
SFX 1656 vati ovem
SFX 1656 vati oveš
SFX 1656 vati ove
SFX 1656 vati ovemo
SFX 1656 vati ovete
SFX 1656 vati ovu
SFX 1656 vati vao
SFX 1656 vati vala
SFX 1656 vati valo
SFX 1656 vati vali
SFX 1656 vati vale
SFX 1656 vati vaću
SFX 1656 vati vaćeš
SFX 1656 vati vaće
SFX 1656 vati vaćemo
SFX 1656 vati vaćete
SFX 1656 vati vaće
SFX 1656 vati ovi
SFX 1656 vati ovimo
SFX 1656 vati ovite
SFX 1656 vati vah
SFX 1656 vati vaše
SFX 1656 vati vasmo
SFX 1656 vati vaste
SFX 1656 vati vahu
SFX 1656 vati vajući

SFX 1657 Y 27
SFX 1657 ati ati
SFX 1657 ati im
SFX 1657 ati iš
SFX 1657 ati i
SFX 1657 ati imo
SFX 1657 ati ite
SFX 1657 ati e
SFX 1657 ati ao
SFX 1657 ati ala
SFX 1657 ati alo
SFX 1657 ati ali
SFX 1657 ati ale
SFX 1657 ati aću
SFX 1657 ati aćeš
SFX 1657 ati aće
SFX 1657 ati aćemo
SFX 1657 ati aćete
SFX 1657 ati aće
SFX 1657 ati i
SFX 1657 ati aio
SFX 1657 ati ite
SFX 1657 ati ah
SFX 1657 ati aše
SFX 1657 ati asmo
SFX 1657 ati aste
SFX 1657 ati ahu
SFX 1657 ati eći

SFX 1658 Y 28
SFX 1658 iti iti
SFX 1658 iti im
SFX 1658 iti iš
SFX 1658 iti i
SFX 1658 iti imo
SFX 1658 iti ite
SFX 1658 iti e
SFX 1658 iti io
SFX 1658 iti ila
SFX 1658 iti ilo
SFX 1658 iti ili
SFX 1658 iti ile
SFX 1658 iti iću
SFX 1658 iti ićeš
SFX 1658 iti iće
SFX 1658 iti ićemo
SFX 1658 iti ićete
SFX 1658 iti iće
SFX 1658 iti i
SFX 1658 iti imo
SFX 1658 iti ite
SFX 1658 iti ih
SFX 1658 iti i
SFX 1658 iti iše
SFX 1658 iti ismo
SFX 1658 iti iste
SFX 1658 iti njahu
SFX 1658 iti ivši

SFX 1659 Y 28
SFX 1659 ti ti
SFX 1659 ti nem
SFX 1659 ti neš
SFX 1659 ti ne
SFX 1659 ti nemo
SFX 1659 ti nete
SFX 1659 ti nu
SFX 1659 ti o
SFX 1659 ti la
SFX 1659 ti lo
SFX 1659 ti li
SFX 1659 ti le
SFX 1659 ti nuću
SFX 1659 ti nućeš
SFX 1659 ti nuće
SFX 1659 ti nućemo
SFX 1659 ti nućete
SFX 1659 ti nuće
SFX 1659 ti ni
SFX 1659 ti nimo
SFX 1659 ti nite
SFX 1659 ti nuh
SFX 1659 ti nu
SFX 1659 ti nuše
SFX 1659 ti nusmo
SFX 1659 ti nuste
SFX 1659 ti hu
SFX 1659 ti nuvši

SFX 1660 Y 27
SFX 1660 njeti njeti
SFX 1660 njeti nim
SFX 1660 njeti niš
SFX 1660 njeti ni
SFX 1660 njeti nimo
SFX 1660 njeti nite
SFX 1660 njeti ne
SFX 1660 njeti nio
SFX 1660 njeti njela
SFX 1660 njeti njelo
SFX 1660 njeti njeli
SFX 1660 njeti njele
SFX 1660 njeti njeću
SFX 1660 njeti njećeš
SFX 1660 njeti njeće
SFX 1660 njeti njećemo
SFX 1660 njeti njećete
SFX 1660 njeti njeće
SFX 1660 njeti ni
SFX 1660 njeti nimo
SFX 1660 njeti nite
SFX 1660 njeti njeh
SFX 1660 njeti nješe
SFX 1660 njeti njesmo
SFX 1660 njeti njeste
SFX 1660 njeti njehu
SFX 1660 njeti njeći

SFX 1661 Y 28
SFX 1661 sati sati
SFX 1661 sati šem
SFX 1661 sati šeš
SFX 1661 sati še
SFX 1661 sati šemo
SFX 1661 sati šete
SFX 1661 sati šu
SFX 1661 sati sao
SFX 1661 sati sala
SFX 1661 sati salo
SFX 1661 sati sali
SFX 1661 sati sale
SFX 1661 sati saću
SFX 1661 sati saćeš
SFX 1661 sati saće
SFX 1661 sati saćemo
SFX 1661 sati saćete
SFX 1661 sati saće
SFX 1661 sati ši
SFX 1661 sati šimo
SFX 1661 sati šite
SFX 1661 sati sah
SFX 1661 sati sa
SFX 1661 sati saše
SFX 1661 sati sasmo
SFX 1661 sati saste
SFX 1661 sati šahu
SFX 1661 sati savši

SFX 1662 Y 28
SFX 1662 psti psti
SFX 1662 psti bem
SFX 1662 psti beš
SFX 1662 psti be
SFX 1662 psti bemo
SFX 1662 psti bete
SFX 1662 psti bu
SFX 1662 psti bao
SFX 1662 psti bla
SFX 1662 psti blo
SFX 1662 psti bli
SFX 1662 psti ble
SFX 1662 psti pšću
SFX 1662 psti pšćeš
SFX 1662 psti pšće
SFX 1662 psti pšćemo
SFX 1662 psti pšćete
SFX 1662 psti pšće
SFX 1662 psti bi
SFX 1662 psti bimo
SFX 1662 psti bite
SFX 1662 psti boh
SFX 1662 psti be
SFX 1662 psti boše
SFX 1662 psti bosmo
SFX 1662 psti boste
SFX 1662 psti bahu
SFX 1662 psti bajući

SFX 1663 Y 27
SFX 1663 ati ati
SFX 1663 ati am
SFX 1663 ati aš
SFX 1663 ati a
SFX 1663 ati amo
SFX 1663 ati ate
SFX 1663 ati aje
SFX 1663 ati ao
SFX 1663 ati ala
SFX 1663 ati alo
SFX 1663 ati ali
SFX 1663 ati ale
SFX 1663 ati aću
SFX 1663 ati aćeš
SFX 1663 ati aće
SFX 1663 ati aćemo
SFX 1663 ati aćete
SFX 1663 ati aće
SFX 1663 ati a
SFX 1663 ati amo
SFX 1663 ati ate
SFX 1663 ati ah
SFX 1663 ati aše
SFX 1663 ati asmo
SFX 1663 ati aste
SFX 1663 ati ahu
SFX 1663 ati ajeći

SFX 1664 Y 28
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiti
SFX 1664 ebiti ebim
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiš
SFX 1664 ebiti ebi
SFX 1664 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1664 ebiti ebite
SFX 1664 ebiti ebe
SFX 1664 ebiti ebio
SFX 1664 ebiti ebila
SFX 1664 ebiti ebilo
SFX 1664 ebiti ebili
SFX 1664 ebiti ebile
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiću
SFX 1664 ebiti ebićeš
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1664 ebiti ebićemo
SFX 1664 ebiti ebićete
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1664 ebiti ebi
SFX 1664 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1664 ebiti ebite
SFX 1664 ebiti ebih
SFX 1664 ebiti ebi
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiše
SFX 1664 ebiti ebismo
SFX 1664 ebiti ebiste
SFX 1664 ebiti abljahu
SFX 1664 ebiti ebivši

SFX 1665 Y 33
SFX 1665 ati ati
SFX 1665 ati am
SFX 1665 ati aš
SFX 1665 ati a
SFX 1665 ati amo
SFX 1665 ati ate
SFX 1665 ati aju
SFX 1665 ati ao
SFX 1665 ati ala
SFX 1665 ati alo
SFX 1665 ati ali
SFX 1665 ati ale
SFX 1665 ati aću
SFX 1665 ati aćeš
SFX 1665 ati aće
SFX 1665 ati aćemo
SFX 1665 ati aćete
SFX 1665 ati aće
SFX 1665 ati aj
SFX 1665 ati ajmo
SFX 1665 ati ajte
SFX 1665 ati ah
SFX 1665 ati ade
SFX 1665 ati aše
SFX 1665 ati asmo
SFX 1665 ati aste
SFX 1665 ati adoh
SFX 1665 ati ade
SFX 1665 ati adoše
SFX 1665 ati adosmo
SFX 1665 ati adoste
SFX 1665 ati ahu
SFX 1665 ati ajući

SFX 1666 Y 36
SFX 1666 eti eti
SFX 1666 eti em
SFX 1666 eti eš
SFX 1666 eti e
SFX 1666 eti emo
SFX 1666 eti ete
SFX 1666 eti im
SFX 1666 eti iš
SFX 1666 eti i
SFX 1666 eti imo
SFX 1666 eti ite
SFX 1666 eti u
SFX 1666 eti eo
SFX 1666 eti ela
SFX 1666 eti elo
SFX 1666 eti eli
SFX 1666 eti ele
SFX 1666 eti eću
SFX 1666 eti ećeš
SFX 1666 eti eće
SFX 1666 eti ećemo
SFX 1666 eti ećete
SFX 1666 eti eće
SFX 1666 eti i
SFX 1666 eti imo
SFX 1666 eti ite
SFX 1666 eti eh
SFX 1666 eti eše
SFX 1666 eti esmo
SFX 1666 eti este
SFX 1666 eti ih
SFX 1666 eti iše
SFX 1666 eti ismo
SFX 1666 eti iste
SFX 1666 eti ehu
SFX 1666 eti ijući
