src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
zašumeti/1653
zbeći/1654
zbiti/1655
zvati/1656
zvrjati/1657
zgrbiti/1658
zdeti/1659
zelenjeti/1660
zemljosati/1661
zepsti/1662
zjati/1663
zloupotrebiti/1664
zloupotrijebiti/1664
znati/1665
zreti/1666
iždrebiti/1664
iždrijebiti/1664
ižlebiti/1664
ižlijebiti/1664
izbeći/1654
izdeti/1659
izlapeti/1653
izumeti/1653
istrebiti/1664
istrijebiti/1664
ishlapeti/1653
natrebiti/1664
oždrebiti/1664
oždrijebiti/1664
ožigosati/1661
ožlebiti/1664
opskrbiti/1658
otrebiti/1664
otrijebiti/1664
pogrbiti/1658
poistrebiti/1664
popatosati/1661
posrbiti/1658
pretrebiti/1664
pretrijebiti/1664
priskrbiti/1658
razbeći/1654
razdeti/1659
rastrebiti/1664
rastrijebiti/1664
rumenjeti/1660
užlebiti/1664
užlijebiti/1664
užljebiti/1664
uzdati/1665
upotrebiti/1664
upotrijebiti/1664
uhlebiti/1664
uhljebiti/1664
crvenjeti/1660
šarenjeti/1660
